src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1767 Y 28
SFX 1767 niti niti
SFX 1767 niti nim
SFX 1767 niti niš
SFX 1767 niti ni
SFX 1767 niti nimo
SFX 1767 niti nite
SFX 1767 niti nu
SFX 1767 niti nio
SFX 1767 niti nila
SFX 1767 niti nilo
SFX 1767 niti nili
SFX 1767 niti nile
SFX 1767 niti niću
SFX 1767 niti nićeš
SFX 1767 niti niće
SFX 1767 niti nićemo
SFX 1767 niti nićete
SFX 1767 niti niće
SFX 1767 niti ni
SFX 1767 niti nimo
SFX 1767 niti nite
SFX 1767 niti nih
SFX 1767 niti ni
SFX 1767 niti niše
SFX 1767 niti nismo
SFX 1767 niti niste
SFX 1767 niti njahu
SFX 1767 niti nivši

SFX 1768 Y 29
SFX 1768 ći ći
SFX 1768 ći gnem
SFX 1768 ći gneš
SFX 1768 ći gne
SFX 1768 ći gnemo
SFX 1768 ći gnete
SFX 1768 ći gnu
SFX 1768 ći gao
SFX 1768 ći gla
SFX 1768 ći glo
SFX 1768 ći gli
SFX 1768 ći gle
SFX 1768 ći gnuću
SFX 1768 ći gnućeš
SFX 1768 ći gnuće
SFX 1768 ći gnućemo
SFX 1768 ći gnućete
SFX 1768 ći gnuće
SFX 1768 ći gni
SFX 1768 ći gnimo
SFX 1768 ći gnite
SFX 1768 ći goh
SFX 1768 ći že
SFX 1768 ći goše
SFX 1768 ći gosmo
SFX 1768 ći goste
SFX 1768 ći gohu
SFX 1768 ći ći
SFX 1768 ći gavši

SFX 1769 Y 33
SFX 1769 nuti nuti
SFX 1769 nuti nem
SFX 1769 nuti neš
SFX 1769 nuti ne
SFX 1769 nuti nemo
SFX 1769 nuti nete
SFX 1769 nuti nu
SFX 1769 nuti nuo
SFX 1769 nuti nula
SFX 1769 nuti nulo
SFX 1769 nuti nuli
SFX 1769 nuti nule
SFX 1769 nuti nuću
SFX 1769 nuti nućeš
SFX 1769 nuti nuće
SFX 1769 nuti nućemo
SFX 1769 nuti nućete
SFX 1769 nuti nuće
SFX 1769 nuti ni
SFX 1769 nuti nimo
SFX 1769 nuti nite
SFX 1769 nuti nuh
SFX 1769 nuti nu
SFX 1769 nuti nuše
SFX 1769 nuti nusmo
SFX 1769 nuti nuste
SFX 1769 nuti toh
SFX 1769 nuti te
SFX 1769 nuti toše
SFX 1769 nuti tosmo
SFX 1769 nuti toste
SFX 1769 nuti njahu
SFX 1769 nuti nuvši

SFX 1770 Y 27
SFX 1770 tići tići
SFX 1770 tići dem
SFX 1770 tići deš
SFX 1770 tići de
SFX 1770 tići demo
SFX 1770 tići dete
SFX 1770 tići du
SFX 1770 tići tišao
SFX 1770 tići tišla
SFX 1770 tići tišlo
SFX 1770 tići tišli
SFX 1770 tići tišle
SFX 1770 tići tidi
SFX 1770 tići tidimo
SFX 1770 tići tidite
SFX 1770 tići tidoh
SFX 1770 tići tide
SFX 1770 tići tidoše
SFX 1770 tići tidosmo
SFX 1770 tići tidoste
SFX 1770 tići doh
SFX 1770 tići de
SFX 1770 tići doše
SFX 1770 tići dosmo
SFX 1770 tići doste
SFX 1770 tići tiđahu
SFX 1770 tići tišavši

SFX 1771 Y 37
SFX 1771 reti reti
SFX 1771 reti rem
SFX 1771 reti reš
SFX 1771 reti re
SFX 1771 reti remo
SFX 1771 reti rete
SFX 1771 reti ru
SFX 1771 reti arem
SFX 1771 reti areš
SFX 1771 reti are
SFX 1771 reti aremo
SFX 1771 reti arete
SFX 1771 reti aru
SFX 1771 reti ro
SFX 1771 reti rla
SFX 1771 reti rlo
SFX 1771 reti rli
SFX 1771 reti rle
SFX 1771 reti reću
SFX 1771 reti rećeš
SFX 1771 reti reće
SFX 1771 reti rećemo
SFX 1771 reti rećete
SFX 1771 reti reće
SFX 1771 reti ri
SFX 1771 reti rimo
SFX 1771 reti rite
SFX 1771 reti ari
SFX 1771 reti arimo
SFX 1771 reti arite
SFX 1771 reti reh
SFX 1771 reti re
SFX 1771 reti reše
SFX 1771 reti resmo
SFX 1771 reti reste
SFX 1771 reti rehu
SFX 1771 reti revši

SFX 1772 Y 28
SFX 1772 ti ti
SFX 1772 ti em
SFX 1772 ti eš
SFX 1772 ti e
SFX 1772 ti emo
SFX 1772 ti ete
SFX 1772 ti u
SFX 1772 ti o
SFX 1772 ti la
SFX 1772 ti lo
SFX 1772 ti li
SFX 1772 ti le
SFX 1772 ti eću
SFX 1772 ti ećeš
SFX 1772 ti eće
SFX 1772 ti ećemo
SFX 1772 ti ećete
SFX 1772 ti eće
SFX 1772 ti i
SFX 1772 ti imo
SFX 1772 ti ite
SFX 1772 ti eh
SFX 1772 ti e
SFX 1772 ti eše
SFX 1772 ti esmo
SFX 1772 ti este
SFX 1772 ti ahu
SFX 1772 ti vši

SFX 1773 Y 28
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiti
SFX 1773 uđiti uđim
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiš
SFX 1773 uđiti uđi
SFX 1773 uđiti uđimo
SFX 1773 uđiti uđite
SFX 1773 uđiti uđe
SFX 1773 uđiti uđio
SFX 1773 uđiti uđila
SFX 1773 uđiti uđilo
SFX 1773 uđiti uđili
SFX 1773 uđiti uđile
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiću
SFX 1773 uđiti uđićeš
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiće
SFX 1773 uđiti uđićemo
SFX 1773 uđiti uđićete
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiće
SFX 1773 uđiti uđi
SFX 1773 uđiti uđimo
SFX 1773 uđiti uđite
SFX 1773 uđiti uđih
SFX 1773 uđiti uđi
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiše
SFX 1773 uđiti uđismo
SFX 1773 uđiti uđiste
SFX 1773 uđiti zuđahu
SFX 1773 uđiti uđivši

SFX 1774 Y 28
SFX 1774 eti eti
SFX 1774 eti etem
SFX 1774 eti eteš
SFX 1774 eti ete
SFX 1774 eti etemo
SFX 1774 eti etete
SFX 1774 eti etu
SFX 1774 eti eo
SFX 1774 eti ela
SFX 1774 eti elo
SFX 1774 eti eli
SFX 1774 eti ele
SFX 1774 eti eću
SFX 1774 eti ećeš
SFX 1774 eti eće
SFX 1774 eti ećemo
SFX 1774 eti ećete
SFX 1774 eti eće
SFX 1774 eti eti
SFX 1774 eti etimo
SFX 1774 eti etite
SFX 1774 eti eh
SFX 1774 eti e
SFX 1774 eti eše
SFX 1774 eti esmo
SFX 1774 eti este
SFX 1774 eti ehu
SFX 1774 eti evši

SFX 1775 Y 28
SFX 1775 sti sti
SFX 1775 sti tem
SFX 1775 sti teš
SFX 1775 sti te
SFX 1775 sti temo
SFX 1775 sti tete
SFX 1775 sti tu
SFX 1775 sti o
SFX 1775 sti la
SFX 1775 sti lo
SFX 1775 sti li
SFX 1775 sti le
SFX 1775 sti šću
SFX 1775 sti šćeš
SFX 1775 sti šće
SFX 1775 sti šćemo
SFX 1775 sti šćete
SFX 1775 sti šće
SFX 1775 sti ti
SFX 1775 sti timo
SFX 1775 sti tite
SFX 1775 sti h
SFX 1775 sti te
SFX 1775 sti še
SFX 1775 sti smo
SFX 1775 sti ste
SFX 1775 sti hu
SFX 1775 sti vši

SFX 1776 Y 27
SFX 1776 ati ati
SFX 1776 ati am
SFX 1776 ati aš
SFX 1776 ati a
SFX 1776 ati amo
SFX 1776 ati ate
SFX 1776 ati a
SFX 1776 ati ao
SFX 1776 ati ala
SFX 1776 ati alo
SFX 1776 ati ali
SFX 1776 ati ale
SFX 1776 ati aću
SFX 1776 ati aćeš
SFX 1776 ati aće
SFX 1776 ati aćemo
SFX 1776 ati aćete
SFX 1776 ati aće
SFX 1776 ati aj
SFX 1776 ati ajmo
SFX 1776 ati ajte
SFX 1776 ati ah
SFX 1776 ati aše
SFX 1776 ati asmo
SFX 1776 ati aste
SFX 1776 ati ahu
SFX 1776 ati ajući

SFX 1777 Y 27
SFX 1777 ti njati
SFX 1777 ti njem
SFX 1777 ti nješ
SFX 1777 ti nje
SFX 1777 ti njemo
SFX 1777 ti njete
SFX 1777 ti nju
SFX 1777 ti o
SFX 1777 ti la
SFX 1777 ti lo
SFX 1777 ti li
SFX 1777 ti le
SFX 1777 ti ću
SFX 1777 ti ćeš
SFX 1777 ti će
SFX 1777 ti ćemo
SFX 1777 ti ćete
SFX 1777 ti će
SFX 1777 ti nji
SFX 1777 ti njimo
SFX 1777 ti njite
SFX 1777 ti h
SFX 1777 ti še
SFX 1777 ti smo
SFX 1777 ti ste
SFX 1777 ti hu
SFX 1777 ti njući

SFX 1778 Y 21
SFX 1778 ći ći
SFX 1778 ći čem
SFX 1778 ći češ
SFX 1778 ći če
SFX 1778 ći čemo
SFX 1778 ći čete
SFX 1778 ći ku
SFX 1778 ći kao
SFX 1778 ći kla
SFX 1778 ći klo
SFX 1778 ći kli
SFX 1778 ći kle
SFX 1778 ći ci
SFX 1778 ći cimo
SFX 1778 ći cite
SFX 1778 ći koh
SFX 1778 ći koše
SFX 1778 ći kosmo
SFX 1778 ći koste
SFX 1778 ći kohu
SFX 1778 ći kući

SFX 1779 Y 27
SFX 1779 kiti kiti
SFX 1779 kiti kim
SFX 1779 kiti kiš
SFX 1779 kiti ki
SFX 1779 kiti kimo
SFX 1779 kiti kite
SFX 1779 kiti ke
SFX 1779 kiti kio
SFX 1779 kiti kila
SFX 1779 kiti kilo
SFX 1779 kiti kili
SFX 1779 kiti kile
SFX 1779 kiti kiću
SFX 1779 kiti kićeš
SFX 1779 kiti kiće
SFX 1779 kiti kićemo
SFX 1779 kiti kićete
SFX 1779 kiti kiće
SFX 1779 kiti ki
SFX 1779 kiti kimo
SFX 1779 kiti kite
SFX 1779 kiti kih
SFX 1779 kiti kiše
SFX 1779 kiti kismo
SFX 1779 kiti kiste
SFX 1779 kiti ahu
SFX 1779 kiti keći

SFX 1780 Y 28
SFX 1780 sti sti
SFX 1780 sti tem
SFX 1780 sti teš
SFX 1780 sti te
SFX 1780 sti temo
SFX 1780 sti tete
SFX 1780 sti tu
SFX 1780 sti o
SFX 1780 sti la
SFX 1780 sti lo
SFX 1780 sti li
SFX 1780 sti le
SFX 1780 sti šću
SFX 1780 sti šćeš
SFX 1780 sti šće
SFX 1780 sti šćemo
SFX 1780 sti šćete
SFX 1780 sti šće
SFX 1780 sti ti
SFX 1780 sti timo
SFX 1780 sti tite
SFX 1780 sti teh
SFX 1780 sti te
SFX 1780 sti toše
SFX 1780 sti tosmo
SFX 1780 sti toste
SFX 1780 sti ćahu
SFX 1780 sti teći

SFX 1781 Y 28
SFX 1781 neti neti
SFX 1781 neti nesem
SFX 1781 neti neseš
SFX 1781 neti nese
SFX 1781 neti nesemo
SFX 1781 neti neste
SFX 1781 neti nesu
SFX 1781 neti neo
SFX 1781 neti nela
SFX 1781 neti nelo
SFX 1781 neti neli
SFX 1781 neti nele
SFX 1781 neti neću
SFX 1781 neti nećeš
SFX 1781 neti neće
SFX 1781 neti nećemo
SFX 1781 neti nećete
SFX 1781 neti neće
SFX 1781 neti nesi
SFX 1781 neti nesimo
SFX 1781 neti nesite
SFX 1781 neti neh
SFX 1781 neti ne
SFX 1781 neti neše
SFX 1781 neti nesmo
SFX 1781 neti neste
SFX 1781 neti njahu
SFX 1781 neti nevši
