src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
okniti/1767
opovrći/1768
osvrnuti/1769
otići/1770
otreti/1771
otrti/1772
otuđiti/1773
ohrometi/1774
ocvasti/1775
perjati/1776
peti/1777
peći/1778
pirjati/1776
piškiti/1779
plesti/1780
povraneti/1781
pometi/1774
potrti/1772
potuđiti/1773
precvasti/1775
provrći/1768
protrti/1772
procvasti/1775
rascvasti/1775
ucvasti/1775
